Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Historic Resources.
§ 10.1-2205.
Board shall promulgate regulations; penalty.

The Board shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out its powers and duties, including at a minimum criteria and procedures for the designation of historic landmarks, including buildings, structures, districts, objects, and sites. Such regulations shall be not inconsistent with the National Historic Preservation Act (P.L. 89-665) and its attendant regulations. The regulations of the Board shall be promulgated in accordance with the Virginia Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Any person who violates any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $500. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state treasury.

History.

1989, c. 656; 1992, cc. 180, 801; 2006, c. 32.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 656 provides in cl. 3 that the Governor may transfer any employees to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the act.

Acts 2006, c. 32, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 32 substituted “including buildings, structures, districts, objects, and sites” for “and historic districts” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 10.1-2206.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 801.

Cross references.

For present provisions, see §

10.1-2206.1

.

§ 10.1-2206.1.
Procedure for designating a historic district, building, structure, or site as a historic landmark; National Register of Historic Places, National Historic Landmarks; historic district defined.

In any county, city, or town where the Board proposes to designate a historic district, building, structure, object, or site as a historic landmark, or where the Director proposes to nominate property to the National Park Service for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or for designation as a National Historic Landmark, the Department shall give written notice of the proposal to the governing body and to the owner, owners, or the owner’s agent, of property proposed to be so designated or nominated, and to the owners, or their agents, of all abutting property and property immediately across the street or road from the property.

Prior to the designation or nomination of a historic district, the Department shall hold a public hearing at the seat of government of the county, city, or town in which the proposed historic district is located or within the proposed historic district. The public hearing shall be for the purpose of supplying additional information to the Board and to the Director. The time and place of such hearing shall be determined in consultation with a duly authorized representative of the local governing body, and shall be scheduled at a time and place that will reasonably allow for the attendance of the affected property owners. The Department shall publish notice of the public hearing once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county, city, or town. Such notice shall specify the time and place of the public hearing at which persons affected may appear and present their views, not less than six days nor more than twenty-one days after the second publication of the notice in such newspaper. In addition to publishing the notice, the Department shall give written notice of the public hearing at least five days before such hearing to the owner, owners, or the owner’s agent, of each parcel of real property to be included in the proposed historic district, and to the owners, or their agents, of all abutting property and property immediately across the street or road from the included property. Notice required to be given to owners by this subsection may be given concurrently with the notice required to be given to the owners by subsection A. The Department shall make and maintain an appropriate record of all public hearings held pursuant to this section.

Any written notice required to be given by the Department to any person shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this section if sent by first class mail to the last known address of such person as shown on the current real estate tax assessment books, provided that a representative of the Department shall make an affidavit that such mailings have been made.

The local governing body and property owners shall have thirty days from the date of the notice required by subsection A, or, in the case of a historic district, thirty days from the date of the public hearing required by subsection B to provide comments and recommendations, if any, to the Board and to the Director.

For the purposes of this chapter, a historic district means a geographically definable area which contains a significant concentration of historic buildings, structures or sites having a common historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural heritage, and which may contain local tax parcels having separate owners. Contributing properties within a registered district are historic landmarks by definition.

All regulations promulgated by the Director pursuant to §

10.1-2202

and all regulations promulgated by the Board pursuant to §

10.1-2205

shall be consistent with the provisions of this section.

History.

1992, c. 801; 2006, c. 32.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 32, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 32, in the section catchline, inserted “as a historic landmark”; in subsection A, deleted “landmark” preceding “building, structure, object, or site” and inserted “as a historic landmark,” inserted “so” following “property proposed to be” and deleted “as a historic landmark building, structure, object, or site or to be included in a historic district” following “designated or nominated”; and in subsection E, inserted “archaeological” following “architectural,” substituted “may contain” for “contains” and added the last sentence.

§ 10.1-2206.2.
Consent of owners required for certain designations by the Board.

Before the Board shall designate any building, structure, district, object, or site as a historic landmark in accordance with §

10.1-2204

, the owners of such property proposed for designation shall be given the opportunity to concur in or object to such designation by the Board. If a majority of the owners of the property within such area proposed for designation object to such designation, the Board shall take no formal action to designate the property as historic until such objection is withdrawn.

For the purposes of this section, majority of owners of the property shall mean a majority of the number of property owners of or within the proposed property or district.

Nothing contained herein shall be deemed or construed to affect any local government charter or ordinance regarding historic districts or historic preservation.

History.

1992, c. 801; 2006, c. 32.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 32, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 32, in subsection A, deleted “historic district, landmark” preceding “building, structure” and inserted “district, object” thereafter, and inserted “as a historic landmark” preceding “in accordance with §

10.1-2204

.”

§ 10.1-2207.
Property to reflect change in market value.

Where the Commonwealth has obtained from a landowner an easement or other partial interest in property which places restrictions on the use or development of that property so as to preserve those features which led to the designation of that property as an historic landmark, the easement or other partial interest shall be recorded in the clerk’s office of the county or city where deeds are admitted to record. Assessments for local taxation of the property shall reflect any resulting change in the market value of the property, as prescribed by §

58.1-3205

.
The Director shall notify the official having the taxing power to make assessments of properties for purposes of taxation within the locality of the restrictions that have been placed on the property.

History.

1966, c. 632, §§ 10-138, 10-139; 1984, cc. 675, 750; 1986, c. 608; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-808; 1989, c. 656.

§ 10.1-2208.
Supervision of expenditure of appropriations made to localities and private organizations.

The Director shall oversee the expenditure of state appropriations made available to organizations, whether localities or private entities, for purposes related to the historical collections, historic landmarks, and historic sites of Virginia, to assure that such purposes are consistent with the statewide plan for historic preservation as established by the Director. The Director shall establish and require adherence to sound professional standards of historical, architectural and archaeological research in the planning, preservation, restoration, interpretation and display of such collections, landmarks, and sites.

History.

1972, c. 119, § 10-138.1; 1984, c. 750; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-809; 1989, c. 656; 2010, c. 291.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 291 substituted “organizations, whether localities or private entities” for “nonstate agencies, whether private or municipal” in the first sentence.

§§ 10.1-2208.1,
10.1-2208.2.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 85, which enacted these sections, in cl. 2 provided: “That should no funds from any source be received in the fund by July 1, 2007, the provisions of this act shall expire.” As of May 15, 2008, no funding had been provided; thus, the sections have expired.

§ 10.1-2209.
Erection of markers, requirements, etc., without certificate of approval forbidden.

It shall be unlawful to post or erect any historical marker, monument, sign or notice, on public property or upon any public street, road or highway in the Commonwealth bearing any legend, inscription or notice which purports to record any historic event, incident or fact, or to maintain any such historical marker, monument, notice, or sign posted or erected after June 17, 1930, unless a written certificate has been issued by the Board or an appropriate predecessor agency attesting to the validity and correct record of the historic event, incident or fact set forth in the marker.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-66; 1950, p. 47; 1964, c. 152; 1970, c. 606, § 10-145.2; 1976, c. 88; 1984, c. 750, § 10-261; 1986, c. 608; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-810; 1989, c. 656.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 852, as amended by Acts 2012, c. 154, provides: “§ 1. There is hereby established The Road to Revolution, a state heritage trail that honors men and women of the founding generation who played a leading role in liberating Virginia from Colonial rule and establishing a constitutional republic. The Trail shall consist of the following sites: Henry’s birthplace at Studley, Virginia; Rural Plains at Mechanicsville, Virginia; Pine Slash at Studley, Virginia; Hampden-Sydney College at Hampden-Sydney, Virginia; St. John’s Church at Richmond, Virginia; Scotchtown at Beaverdam, Virginia; Hanover Tavern at Hanover, Virginia; the Hanover County Courthouse at Hanover, Virginia; Historic Polegreen Church at Mechanicsville, Virginia; Leatherwood Plantation at Henry County, Virginia; Red Hill Plantation and the Patrick Henry National Memorial, at Brookneal, Virginia; and all additional sites determined to meet the criteria established by The Road to Revolution Heritage Trail Consortium in sole partnership with the Richmond Metropolitan Convention and Visitors Bureau. Criteria for sites shall include places and related events of significance to the lives of those who contributed to the establishment of these United States. The Virginia Department of Transportation shall erect one identifying sign in the Department’s right-of-way at each site only by request of a local government, historical organization, or foundation with custodial responsibilities for that site. Directional signs for travelers to these sites may be erected and maintained by similar request. Directional signage shall be placed at the nearest intersection to each site in the Department’s right-of-way if there is no conflict with other Department signage. All signs shall consist of a common sign design developed by a committee consisting of one representative of each historical organization, foundation, or local governing body and the Director of the Department of Historic Resources. Sign panels and posts shall meet Department of Transportation specifications. All costs associated with manufacturing, erection, and maintenance of signs under this section shall be borne by the requesting party. Signs erected by the Virginia Department of Transportation under this section shall be developed in accordance with applicable provisions of §

10.1-2209

and placed in accordance with all applicable Virginia Department of Transportation regulations.”

§ 10.1-2210.
Erection of markers by local governing bodies.

The governing body of any county, city or town may, at its own expense, have erected a historical marker commemorating any person, event or place upon any public street, road or highway within its boundaries, provided that the person, event or place to be commemorated is identified with or representative of a local aspect of history. The governing body, or its duly authorized agent, shall first determine, on the basis of documented research, that the text of the marker appears to be true and correct. The local markers shall differ in style and appearance from state historical markers, and shall display, on the face of the markers, prominent notice of the governing body, or its agent, which approved the text of the marker. Design, appearance and size and height specifications for local markers shall be reviewed and approved by the Board.

If the person, event or place to be commemorated is prominently identified with, or best representative of a major aspect of state or national history, then the text of the marker shall be approved as provided in §

10.1-2209

.

History.

1970, c. 606, § 10-145.6; 1976, c. 88; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-811; 1989, c. 656.

§ 10.1-2211.
Disbursement of funds appropriated for caring for Confederate cemeteries and graves.

At the direction of the Director, the Comptroller of the Commonwealth is instructed and empowered to draw annual warrants upon the State Treasurer from any sums that may be provided in the general appropriation act, in favor of the treasurers of the Confederate memorial associations and chapters of the United Daughters of the Confederacy set forth in subsection B of this section. Such sums shall be expended by the associations and organizations for the routine maintenance of their respective Confederate cemeteries and graves and for the graves of Confederate soldiers and sailors not otherwise cared for in other cemeteries, and in erecting and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers and sailors. All such associations and organizations, through their proper officers, are required after July 1 of each year to submit to the Director a certified statement that the funds appropriated to the association or organization in the preceding fiscal year were or will be expended for the routine maintenance of cemeteries specified in this section and the graves of Confederate soldiers and sailors and in erecting and caring for markers, memorials and monuments to the memory of such soldiers and sailors. An association or organization failing to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall be prohibited from receiving moneys allocated under this section for all subsequent fiscal years until the association or organization fully complies with the requirements.

Allocation of appropriations made pursuant to this section shall be based on the number of graves, monuments and markers as set forth opposite the association’s or organization’s name, or as documented by each association or organization multiplied by the rate of $5 or the average actual cost of routine maintenance, whichever is greater, for each grave, monument or marker in the care of a Confederate memorial association or chapter of the United Daughters of the Confederacy. For the purposes of this section the “average actual cost of care” shall be determined by the Department in a biennial survey of at least four properly maintained cemeteries, each located in a different geographical region of the Commonwealth.

Click to view

In addition to funds that may be provided pursuant to subsection B, any of the Confederate memorial associations and chapters of the United Daughters of the Confederacy set forth in subsection B may apply to the Director for grants to perform extraordinary maintenance, renovation, repair or reconstruction of any of their respective Confederate cemeteries and graves and for the graves of Confederate soldiers and sailors. These grants shall be made from any appropriation made available by the General Assembly for such purpose. In making such grants, the Director shall give full consideration to the assistance available from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or other agencies, except in those instances where such assistance is deemed by the Director to be detrimental to the historical, artistic or architectural significance of the site.

Local matching funds shall not be required for grants made pursuant to this section.

IN THE COUNTIES OF: NUMBER: Accomack Robert E. Lee Chapter, U.D.C., Belle Haven 10 Albemarle Albemarle Chapter, U.D.C 50 Mountain Plain Cemetery, Crozet 15 Mt. Zion United Methodist Church, Esmont 10 Scottsville Chapter, U.D.C 40 Westerly Chapel Cemetery, Free Union 15 Amelia Grub Hill Church 10 Appomattox Appomattox Chapter, U.D.C 50 Augusta Augusta Stone Presbyterian Church Cemetery 40 Salem Lutheran Church Cemetery 37 Trinity Lutheran Church Cemetery 13 Botetourt Fairview Cemetery Association, Inc 20 Glade Creek Cemetery Corporation 10 Buchanan Ratliff 30 Carroll Floyd Webb Cemetery 16 Robinson Cemetery 10 Worrell Cemetery 10 Charles City County Salem Church Cemetery 35 Chesterfield Ettrick Cemetery 47 Skinquarter Baptist Church Cemetery 15 Craig Archibald A. Caldwell Cemetery 4 Culpeper Culpeper Chapter, U.D.C 10 Dinwiddie Dinwiddie Confederate Memorial Association 15 Fairfax Fairfax Chapter, U.D.C 15 Robert E. Lee Chapter No. 56 36 Fauquier Black Horse Chapter, U.D.C 10 Marshall Cemetery 10 Piedmont Chapter, U.D.C 10 Upperville Methodist Church Cemetery 10 Floyd Floyd County Confederate Memorial Association 20 Southward Cemetery 10 Giles McComas Chapter, U.D.C 15 Goochland Goochland Chapter, U.D.C 15 Grayson A. B. Cox Cemetery 10 Atkins Memorial Cemetery 10 Bethel Church Cemetery 10 Bridlecreek Cemetery 10 Camet B. Cox Cemetery 10 Comer’s Rock Cemetery 10 Cox’s Chapel 10 Fellowship Baptist Cemetery 10 Fries Ridge Cemetery 10 Forest Cemetery 10 Fox Creek Cemetery 10 Funk Cemetery 10 Gold Hill Cemetery 10 Grubbs Chapel Cemetery 10 Hale Cemetery 15 Hines Branch Cemetery 10 Independence Cemetery 10 Jerusalem Methodist Episcopal Church Cemetery 10 Lebanon Cemetery 10 Liberty Hill Cemetery 15 Long Branch Cemetery 10 McKenzie Cemetery 10 New Hope Cemetery 10 Oak Grove Cemetery 10 Potato Creek Cemetery 10 Pugh Cemetery 10 Rhudy Cemetery 10 Round Meadows Cemetery 10 Rugby Cemetery 10 Saddle Creek Cemetery 10 Sawyers Family Cemetery 10 Spring Valley Cemetery 10 Whitetop Cemetery 10 Greene Gentry Methodist Church Cemetery 10 Halifax Grace Churchyard, Inc., Seaton 3 Halifax Chapter, U.D.C 20 St. John’s Episcopal Church 31 Hanover Hanover Chapter, U.D.C 20 Henrico Emmanuel Episcopal Church at Brook Hill 86 Isle of Wight Isle of Wight Chapter, U.D.C 20 Lee Light Horse Harry Lee Chapter, U.D.C 100 Ely Cemetery 30 Loudoun Ebenezer Cemetery 15 Lakeview Cemetery, Hamilton 15 Lee Chapter No. 179 10 Leesburg Union Cemetery 15 Sharon Cemetery, Middleburg 20 Louisa Oakland Cemetery 70 Lunenburg Sons of the Confederate Veterans Old Free State Camp #1746 141 Madison Madison Chapter, U.D.C 10 Mecklenburg Boydton Chapter, U.D.C 10 Armistead-Goode Chapter, U.D.C 10 Montgomery Doctor Harvey Black Chapter, U.D.C 10 White Cemetery, Inc 10 Nelson Nelson County Confederate Memorial Association 10 Nottoway Confederate Memorial Board 15 Orange Maplewood Cemetery, Gordonsville 696 Preddys Creek Cemetery 10 13th Virginia Regiment Chapter, U.D.C 30 Patrick Confederate Memorial Association 40 Pittsylvania Pittsylvania County Historical Society 30 Powhatan Huguenot Springs Cemetery 130 Prince Edward Farmville Chapter, U.D.C 50 Prince George City Point Chapter, U.D.C., for use at Old Town Cemetery 20 Pulaski Pulaski Chapter, U.D.C 10 Roanoke Southern Cross Chapter, U.D.C 10 Old Tombstone Cemetery 20 Rockbridge New Monmouth Presbyterian Church 80 New Providence Presbyterian Church 98 Rockingham Cedar Grove Cemetery 68 Cooks Creek Presbyterian Church Cemetery 39 Singers Glen Cemetery 19 St. Johns Lutheran Cemetery 10 Scott Prospect Community Cemetery 20 McKenney-Carter Cemetery Association 20 Confederate Memorial Branch, Wolfe Cemetery Association, Yuma 15 Estill Memorial Cemetery Association 35 Lawson Confederate Memorial Cemetery 10 Mount Pleasant Cemetery 20 Salling Memorial, Slant 20 Rollins Cemetery 10 Daugherty Cemetery 20 Nickelsville Baptist Church Cemetery 20 Shenandoah New Market Confederate Memorial Association 40 Stover Camp Chapter, U.D.C 10 Mt. Jackson-Old Soldier Cemetery 100 Smyth Aspenvale Cemetery 10 Blue Springs Cemetery, Sugar Grove 10 Centenary Cemetery 10 Chatham Hill Cemetery 10 Greenwood Cemetery 10 Holston Chapter, U.D.C 20 Keesling Cemetery, Rural Retreat 10 Middle Fork Cemetery 10 Morgan Cemetery, Sugar Grove 10 Mt. Carmel Cemetery 20 Mountain View Cemetery, Chilhowie 10 Mt. Zion Cemetery 10 Pleasant Hill Cemetery, Groseclose 12 Ridgedale Cemetery, Rich Valley 10 Riverside Cemetery in Rich Valley 10 Round Hill Cemetery 20 Slemp Cemetery, Sugar Grove 10 St. James Cemetery, Chilhowie 10 South Fork Baptist Cemetery 10 Steffey Cemetery, Groseclose 10 Wassum Cemetery, Atkins 10 Zion Methodist Cemetery, Rich Valley 14 Riverside Cemetery on South Fork 10 Royal Oak Cemetery 10 St. Clair’s Bottom Cemetery, Chilhowie 10 Sulphur Springs Cemetery 10 Southampton Southampton Chapter, U.D.C 40 Spotsylvania Ladies Confederate Memorial Association 749 Surry General William Mahone Chapter, U.D.C 40 Tazewell Maplewood Cemetery 20 Hankins Cemetery 20 Warren Warren Rifles Chapter, U.D.C 25 Washington Anna Stonewall Jackson Chapter, U.D.C 20 Emory and Henry Cemetery 203 Greendale Cemetery 20 Warren Cemetery 20 Wise Big Stone Gap Chapter, U.D.C 20 Wythe Asbury Cemetery, Rural Retreat 10 Fairview Cemetery, Rural Retreat 10 Galilee Christian Church Cemetery 10 Grubbs Cemetery 10 Kemberling Cemetery 10 Marvin Cemetery 30 Mt. Ephraim Cemetery 10 Mount Mitchell Cemetery 10 Mountain View Cemetery 46 Murphysville Cemetery 10 St. John’s Cemetery 10 St. Mary’s Cemetery 10 St. Paul’s Cemetery 14 St. Peter’s Lutheran Church Cemetery 12 Speedwell Methodist Cemetery 10 Wythe-Gray Chapter, U.D.C 20 Zion Cemetery 10 York Bethel Memorial Association 20 IN THE CITIES OF: Alexandria Old Dominion Rifles Confederate Memorial Association 98 Old Presbyterian Meeting House 62 Bristol Bristol Confederate Memorial Association 60 Charlottesville Effort Baptist Church 10 Clifton Forge Julia Jackson Chapter, U.D.C 15 Chesapeake Norfolk County Grays Chapter 2535, U.D.C 8 Covington Alleghany Chapter, U.D.C 30 Danville Eliza Johns Chapter, U.D.C 201 Fredericksburg Fredericksburg Cemetery 310 Fredericksburg Confederate Memorial Association 200 Hampton Hampton Chapter, U.D.C 60 Harrisonburg Turner Ashby Chapter, U.D.C 60 Woodbine Cemetery 140 Lexington Rockbridge Chapter, U.D.C 126 Lynchburg Lynchburg Confederate Memorial Association 30 Manassas Ladies Confederate Memorial Association of Manassas 15 Martinsville Mildred Lee Chapter, U.D.C 10 Newport News Bethel Chapter, U.D.C 50 Norfolk Hope Maury Chapter, U.D.C 10 Pickett-Buchanan Chapter, U.D.C 20 Petersburg Petersburg Chapter, U.D.C., for Prince George County 15 Ladies Memorial Association of Petersburg 140 Portsmouth Ladies Confederate Memorial Association 15 Portsmouth Cedar Grove Cemetery 407 Radford New River Gray’s Chapter, U.D.C 15 Radford Chapter, U.D.C 15 Richmond Centennial Chapter, U.D.C 20 Elliott Grays Chapter, U.D.C 15 Janet Randolph Chapter, U.D.C 15 Lee Chapter, U.D.C 20 Sons of Confederate Veterans — Virginia Division 2294 Richmond-Stonewall Jackson Chapter, U.D.C 110 Roanoke Roanoke Chapter, U.D.C 40 William Watts Chapter, U.D.C 40 Salem Southern Cross Chapter, U.D.C 271 Staunton Confederate Section, Thornrose Cemetery 600 Suffolk Cedar Hill Cemetery 197 Vinton Major Wm. F. Graves Chapter, U.D.C 40 Williamsburg Williamsburg Chapter, U.D.C 125 Winchester Stonewall Confederate Memorial Association 2112

History.

Code 1950, § 2.1-206.1; 1977, c. 242; 1978, c. 726; 1979, cc. 19, 151; 1980, c. 672; 1981, c. 537, § 10.145.11; 1984, cc. 412, 750; 1985, cc. 263, 267; 1986, cc. 120, 385; 1988, cc. 310, 891, § 10.1-812; 1989, cc. 656, 711; 1992, c. 640; 1994, c. 78; 1995, c. 176; 1997, cc. 72, 255, 270, 811; 1998, c. 233; 1999, c. 473; 2000, c. 114; 2001, cc. 267, 279, 284; 2002, cc. 181, 188, 225; 2003, c. 585; 2006, cc. 489, 630; 2009, c. 53; 2011, cc. 543, 603; 2012, c. 534; 2013, c. 42; 2014, cc. 15, 46, 110; 2016, c. 43.

Cross references.

As to the availability of state funds to nonstate agencies, see § 2.2-1505.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 811, c. 2 provides: “That the provision of this act relating to the Sons of the Confederate Veterans, Oakwood Committee, shall become effective on July 1, 1998, and only if funding to implement that provision in an amount consistent with provisions of subsection B of §

10.1-2211

is provided in the general appropriation act for each fiscal year of the biennium ending June 30, 2000.” It appears the appropriation was not made.

Acts 1997, c. 811, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of this act or any provision of subsection C of §

10.1-2211

, the Sons of the Confederate Veterans, Oakwood Committee, shall be eligible, beginning July 1, 1997, for a one time grant that is subject to the approval of the Director and not to exceed $ 30,000, for purposes consistent with those of subsection C of §

10.1-2211

. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of §

10.1-2211

relating to the funding source for grants, the grant may be made from available appropriated funds.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 385 T, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “T.1. Out of the amounts for Financial Assistance for Historic Preservation shall be paid from the general fund grants to the following organization for the purposes prescribed in § 10.1- 2211, Code of Virginia:

“ORGANIZATION
FY 2021
FY 2022

United Daughters
of the Confederacy
$83,570

“Notwithstanding the cited Code section, the United Daughters of the Confederacy shall make disbursements to the treasurers of Confederate memorial associations and chapters of the United Daughters of the Confederacy for the purposes stated in that section. By November 1, 2020, the United Daughters of the Confederacy shall submit to the Director, Department of Historic Resources, a report documenting the disbursement of these funds for their specified purpose.

“2. As disbursements are made to the treasurers of Confederate memorial associations and chapters of the United Daughters of the Confederacy by the United Daughters of the Confederacy for the purposes stated in §

10.1-2211

, Code of Virginia, an amount equal to $7,500 in the first year shall be distributed to the Ladies Memorial Association of Petersburg.

“3. As disbursements are made to the treasurers of Confederate memorial associations and chapters of the United Daughters of the Confederacy by the United Daughters of the Confederacy for the purposes stated in §

10.1-2211

, Code of Virginia, an amount equal to $90 the first year shall be distributed to the Town of Coeburn Municipal Graveyard.”

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendment by c. 811 added “Chesapeake” and “Norfolk County Grays Chapter 2535, U.D.C.
. . . . . . . .
8” preceding “Covington” under the heading “IN THE CITIES OF:”; added “Sons of Confederate Veterans, Oakwood Committee
. . . . . . . .
(to be determined by the Director, in consultation with the City of Richmond and the Sons of the Confederate Veterans, in a manner consistent with the administration and practice of this grant program)” preceding “Roanoke” under the heading “IN THE CITIES OF:”; and substituted “Veterans Affairs” for “Veteran’s Affairs” in subsection C. For the effective date of the amendments by c. 811, see the Editor notes above.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, in the listing of counties, under Halifax, St. John’s Episcopal Church heading, in the number column, substituted “31” for “3.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection B, in the listing of counties, added “Henrico” and “Emmanual Episcopal Church at Brook Hill ....... 86” preceding “Isle of Wight.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 114 inserted “Cedar Grove Cemetery” following “Rockingham” in the list of cemeteries located in counties in subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 267, in subsection B, in the listing of counties, added “Floyd Webb Cemetery . . . . . . 16” following “Carroll” County.

The 2001 amendment by c. 279, in subsection B, in the listing of cities, under the entry for the City of Richmond, inserted “Oakwood Confederate Cemetery Trust, Inc. . . . . . . 2294” following “Lee Chapter, U.D.C.,” and deleted “Sons of Confederate Veterans, Oakwood Committee . . . . . . (to be determined by the
Director, in consultation with the City of Richmond and the Sons of the Confederate Veterans, in a manner consistent with the administration and practice of this grant program)” preceding “Roanoke.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 284, in subsection B, in the listing of counties, in the entry for Maplewood Cemetery, Gordonsville, substituted “696” for “60.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 181, in subsection B, in the listing of counties, added the entries for Rockbridge County, including “New Monmouth Presbyterian Church” and “New Providence Presbyterian Church.”

The 2002 amendments by cc. 188 and 225 are identical, and in subsection B, in the listing of counties, added the entry for Chesterfield county and “Ettrick Cemetery.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 585, in subsection B, substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in the introductory language, and added an entry for “Trinity Lutheran Church Cemetery” under “Augusta” in the table.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 489 substituted “Sons of Confederate Veterans — Virginia Division” for “Oakwood Confederate Cemetery Trust, Inc.” in the Richmond listings in subsection B.

The 2006 amendment by c. 630 substituted “2112” for “180” in the listing for “Stonewall Confederate Memorial Association” in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 53, in subsection B, in the listing of counties, inserted the entries for “Skinquarter Baptist Church Cemetery” under “Chesterfield” and “McKenzie Cemetery” under “Grayson.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 543, in subsection B, in the city of Portsmouth, added the entry for “Portsmouth Cedar Grove Cemetery.”

The 2011 amendment by c. 603, in subsection B, in the city of Fredericksburg, added the entry for “Fredericksburg Cemetery”; and in subsection C, deleted “of this section” following the first occurrence of “subsection B.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 534, in subsection B, in the city of Alexandria, substituted “98” for “160” in the listing for “Old Dominion Rifles Confederate Memorial Association” and added the listing for “Old Presbyterian Meeting House.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 42, in subsection B, in the listing of counties, following “Henrico” substituted “Emmanuel” for “Emmanual”; following “Smyth” substituted “St. Clair’s” for “St. Clairs”; and following Spotsylvania, in the entry for “Ladies Confederate Memorial Association” substituted “749” for “300.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 15 and 46 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “Pittsylvania County Historical Society” for “Rawley Martin Chapter, U.D.C.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 110, in subsection B, substituted “Skinquarter Baptist Church Cemetery ... 15” for “Skinquarter Baptist Church Cemetery ... 12.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 43 added the entry for “Cedar Hill Cemetery” in the city of Suffolk in subsection B.